Washington statutes.
RCW 35.55.020

Alternative methods of financing.

If the city council desires to make any improvement authorized by the provisions of this chapter it shall provide therefor by ordinance and unless the ordinance provides that the improvement shall be paid for wholly or in part by special assessments upon the property benefited, compensation therefor shall be made from any general funds of the city applicable thereto. If the ordinance provides that the improvement shall be paid for wholly or in part by special assessments upon property benefited, the proceedings for the making of the special assessments shall be as hereinafter provided.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.55.020. Prior: 1909 c 147 s 2, part; RRS s 9433, part.]

NOTES:

Special assessments or taxation for local improvements: State Constitution Art. 7 s 9.